Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Chapter 5. Courts of Limited Jurisdiction.

§§ 16.1-70 through 16.1-75.
Repealed by Acts 2018, c. 164, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

16.1-70

pertaining to certain city and town police courts, derived from 1956, c. 555.

Former § 16.1-70.1, pertaining to abolition of municipal court of the Town of Herndon, derived from 1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1974, c. 648; 1977, c. 95.

Former § 16.1-71, pertaining to applicability of provisions of municipal charters and the authority of city or town council, derived from Acts 1956, c. 555.

Former § 16.1-72, pertaining to removal of actions involving more than fifty dollars, derived from Acts 1956, c. 555.

Former § 16.1-73, pertaining to appeals of actions in municipal courts, derived from Acts 1956, c. 555.

Former § 16.1-74, pertaining to procedure in certain courts of limited jurisdiction, derived from Acts 1956, c. 555.

Former § 16.1-75, pertaining to jurisdiction of mayors, etc., superseded, and continuance of other powers of courts of limited jurisdiction, derived from Acts 1956, c. 555.

§ 16.1-75.1.
Repealed by Acts 1973, c. 545.